North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-295.2.
Financial responsibility requirements for applicants and permit holders for solid waste management facilities.

As used in this section:

“Financial assurance” refers to the ability of an applicant or permit holder to pay the costs of assessment and remediation in the event of a release of pollutants from a facility, closure of the facility in accordance with all applicable requirements,
and post-closure monitoring and maintenance of the facility.

“Financial qualification” refers to the ability of an applicant or permit holder to pay the costs of proper design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the facility.

“Financial responsibility” encompasses both financial assurance and financial qualification.

The Commission may adopt rules governing financial responsibility requirements for applicants for permits and for permit holders to ensure the availability of sufficient funds for the proper design, construction, operation, maintenance, closure, and post-closure
monitoring and maintenance of solid waste management facilities and for any corrective action the Department may require during the active life of a facility or during the closure and post-closure periods.

The Department may provide a copy of any filing that an applicant for a permit or a permit holder submits to the Department to meet the financial responsibility requirements under this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall review the
filing and provide the Department with a written opinion as to the adequacy of the filing to meet the purposes of this section, including any recommended changes.

The Department may, in its sole discretion, require an applicant for a permit to construct a facility to demonstrate its financial qualification for the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of a facility. The Department may require an applicant
for a permit for a solid waste management facility to provide cost estimates for site investigation; land acquisition, including financing terms and land ownership; design; construction of each five-year phase, if applicable; operation;
maintenance; closure; and post-closure monitoring and maintenance of the facility to the Department. The Department may allow an applicant to demonstrate its financial qualifications for only the first five-year phase of the facility.
If the Department allows an applicant for a permit to demonstrate its financial qualification for only the first five-year phase of the facility, the Department shall require the applicant or permit holder to demonstrate its financial
qualification for each successive five-year phase of the facility when applying for a permit to construct each successive phase of the facility.

If the Department requires an applicant for a permit or a permit holder for a solid waste management facility to demonstrate its financial qualification, the applicant or permit holder shall provide an audited, certified financial statement. An applicant
who is required to demonstrate its financial qualification may do so through a combination of cash deposits, insurance, and binding loan commitments from a financial institution licensed to do business in the State and rated AAA
by Standard & Poor’s, Moody’s Investor Service, or Fitch, Inc. If assets of a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant or a permit holder, or a joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant
or permit holder, are proposed to be used to demonstrate financial qualification, then the party whose assets are to be used must be designated as a joint permittee with the applicant on the permit for the facility.

The applicant and permit holder for a solid waste management facility shall establish financial assurance by a method or combination of methods that will ensure that sufficient funds for closure, post-closure maintenance and monitoring, and any corrective
action that the Department may require will be available during the active life of the facility, at closure, and for any post-closure period of time that the Department may require even if the applicant or permit holder becomes
insolvent or ceases to reside, be incorporated, do business, or maintain assets in the State. Rules adopted by the Commission shall allow a business entity that is an applicant for a permit or a permit holder to establish financial
assurance through insurance, irrevocable letters of credit, trusts, surety bonds, corporate financial tests, or any other financial device as allowed pursuant to 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 258.74 (July 1, 2010 Edition), or
any combination of the foregoing shown to provide protection equivalent to the financial protection that would be provided by insurance if insurance were the only mechanism used. Assets used to meet the financial assurance requirements
of this section shall be in a form that will allow the Department to readily access funds for the purposes set out in this section. Assets used to meet financial assurance requirements of this section shall not be accessible to
the permit holder except as approved by the Department. Where a corporate financial test is used that is substantially similar to that allowed under 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 258.74 (July 1, 2010 Edition), the assets shall
be presumed both to be readily accessible by the Department and not otherwise accessible to the permit holder.

In order to continue to hold a permit under this Article, a permit holder must maintain financial responsibility and must provide any information requested by the Department to establish that the permit holder continues to maintain financial responsibility.
A permit holder shall notify the Department of any significant change in the: (i) identity of any person or structure of the business entity that holds the permit for the facility; (ii) identity of any person or structure of the
business entity that owns or operates the facility; or (iii) assets of the permit holder, owner, or operator of the facility. The permit holder shall notify the Department within 30 days of a significant change. A change shall
be considered significant if it has the potential to affect the financial responsibility of the permit holder, owner, or operator, or if it would result in a change in the identity of the permit holder, owner, or operator for purposes
of either financial responsibility or environmental compliance review. Based on its review of the changes, the Department may require the permit holder to reestablish financial responsibility and may modify or revoke a permit,
or require issuance of a new permit.

To meet the financial assurance requirements of this section, the owner or operator of a sanitary landfill, other than a sanitary landfill for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste, shall establish financial assurance sufficient to
cover a minimum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in costs for potential assessment and corrective action at the facility. The Department may require financial assurance in a higher amount and may increase the amount of financial
assurance required of a permit holder at any time based upon the types of waste disposed in the landfill, the projected amount of waste to be disposed in the landfill, the location of the landfill, potential receptors of releases
from the landfill, and inflation. The financial assurance requirements of this subsection are in addition to the other financial responsibility requirements set out in this section.

(h1)
To meet the financial assurance requirements of this section, the owner or operator of a sanitary landfill for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste shall establish financial assurance sufficient
to cover a minimum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in costs for potential assessment and corrective action at the facility. The financial assurance requirements of this subsection are in addition to the other financial
responsibility requirements set out in this section.

The Commission may adopt rules under which a unit of local government and a solid waste management authority created pursuant to Article 22 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes may meet the financial responsibility requirements of this section by either
a local government financial test or a capital reserve fund requirement.

In addition to the other methods by which financial assurance may be established as set forth in subsection (f) of this section, the Department may allow the owner or operator of a sanitary landfill permitted on or before August 1, 2009, to meet the financial
assurance requirement set forth in subsection (h) of this section by establishing a trust fund which conforms to the following minimum requirements:

The trustee shall be an entity which has the authority to act as a trustee and whose trust operations are regulated and examined by a State or federal agency.

A copy of the trust agreement shall be placed in the facility’s operating record.

Payments into the trust fund shall be made annually by the owner or operator over a period not to exceed five years. This period is referred to as the pay-in period.

Payments into the fund shall be made in equal annual installments in amounts calculated by dividing the current cost estimate for potential assessment and corrective action at the facility, which, for a sanitary landfill, other than a sanitary landfill
for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste, shall not be less than two million dollars ($2,000,000) in accordance with subsection (h) of this section, by the number of years in the pay-in period.

The trust fund may be terminated by the owner or operator only if the owner or operator establishes financial assurance by another method or combination of methods allowed under subsection (f) of this section.

The trust agreement shall be accompanied by a formal certification of acknowledgement.

History.
2007-550, s. 5(a); 2011-262, s. 1; 2014-120, s. 27.

§ 130A-295.3.
Environmental compliance review requirements for applicants and permit holders.

For purposes of this section, “applicant” means an applicant for a permit and a permit holder and includes the owner or operator of the facility, and, if the owner or operator is a business entity, applicant also includes: (i) the parent, subsidiary,
or other affiliate of the applicant; (ii) a partner, officer, director, member, or manager of the business entity, parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant; and (iii) any person with a direct or indirect interest
in the applicant, other than a minority shareholder of a publicly traded corporation who has no involvement in management or control of the corporation or any of its parents, subsidiaries, or affiliates.

The Department shall conduct an environmental compliance review of each applicant for a new permit and permit amendment under this Article. The environmental compliance review shall evaluate the environmental compliance history of the applicant for a
period of five years prior to the date of the application and may cover a longer period at the discretion of the Department. The environmental compliance review of an applicant may include consideration of the environmental compliance
history of the parents, subsidiaries, or other affiliates of an applicant or parent that is a business entity, including any business entity or joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, and other facilities
owned or operated by any of them. The Department shall determine the scope of the review of the environmental compliance history of the applicant, parents, subsidiaries, or other affiliates of the applicant or parent, including
any business entity or joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, and of other facilities owned or operated by any of them. An applicant for a permit shall provide environmental compliance history information
for each facility, business entity, joint venture, or other undertaking in which any of the persons listed in this subsection is or has been an owner, operator, officer, director, manager, member, or partner, or in which any of
the persons listed in this subsection has had a direct or indirect interest as requested by the Department.

The Department shall determine the extent to which the applicant, or a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant or parent, or a joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, has substantially complied with the requirements
applicable to any activity in which any of these entities previously engaged, and has substantially complied with federal and State laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment. The Department may deny an
application for a permit if the applicant has a history of significant or repeated violations of statutes, rules, orders, or permit terms or conditions for the protection of the environment or for the conservation of natural resources
as evidenced by civil penalty assessments, administrative or judicial compliance orders, or criminal penalties.

A permit holder shall notify the Department of any significant change in its environmental compliance history or other information required by G.S. 130-295.2(g). The Department may reevaluate the environmental compliance history of a permit holder and
may modify or revoke a permit or require issuance of a new permit.

History.
2007-550, s. 6(a); 2015-241, s. 14.20(d); 2015-286, s. 4.9(c); 2017-10, s. 3.1(c).

§ 130A-295.4.
Combustion products landfills.

The definitions set out in G.S. 130A-290(a) apply to this section.

The Department may permit a combustion products landfill to be constructed partially or entirely within areas that have been formerly used for the storage or disposal of combustion products at the same facility as the coal-fired generating unit that generates
the combustion products, provided the landfill is constructed with a bottom liner system consisting of three components in accordance with this section. Of the required three components, the upper two components shall consist of
two separate flexible membrane liners, with a leak detection system between the two liners. The third component shall consist of a minimum of two feet of soil underneath the bottom of those liners, with the soil having a maximum
permeability of 1 x 10-7 centimeters per second. The flexible membrane liners shall have a minimum thickness of thirty one-thousandths of an inch (0.030"), except that liners consisting of high-density polyethylene shall be at
least sixty one-thousandths of an inch (0.060") thick. The lower flexible membrane liner shall be installed in direct and uniform contact with the compacted soil layer. The Department may approve an alternative to the soil component
of the composite liner system if the Department finds, based on modeling, that the alternative liner system will provide an equivalent or greater degree of impermeability.

An applicant for a permit for a combustion products landfill shall develop and provide to the Department a response plan, which shall describe the circumstances under which corrective measures are to be taken at the landfill in the event of the detection
of leaks in the leak detection system between the upper two liner components at amounts exceeding an amount specified in the response plan (as expressed in average gallons per day per acre of landfill, defined as an Action Leakage
Rate). The response plan shall also describe the remedial actions that the landfill is required to undertake in response to detection of leakage in amounts in excess of the Action Leakage Rate. The Department shall review the response
plan as a part of the permit application for the landfill. Compliance with performance of the landfill to prevent releases of waste to the environment may be determined based on leakage rate rather than monitoring well data.

History.
2007-550, s. 7(b).

§ 130A-295.5.
Traffic study required for certain solid waste management facilities.

An applicant for a permit for a sanitary landfill or for a transfer station shall conduct a traffic study of the impacts of the proposed facility. The Department shall include as a condition of a permit for a sanitary landfill or for a transfer station
a requirement that the permit holder mitigate adverse impacts identified by the traffic study. The study shall include all of the following at a minimum:

Identification of routes from the nearest limited access highway used to access the proposed facility.

Daily and hourly traffic volumes that will result along each approach route between the nearest limited access highway and the proposed facility.

A map identifying land uses located along the identified approach routes, including, but not limited to, residential, commercial, industrial development, and agricultural operations. The map shall identify residences, schools, hospitals, nursing homes,
and other significant buildings that front the approach routes.

Identification of locations on approach routes where road conditions are inadequate to handle the increased traffic associated with the proposed facility and a description of the mitigation measures proposed by the applicant to address the conditions.

A description of the potential adverse impacts of increased traffic associated with the proposed facility and the mitigation measures proposed by the applicant to address these impacts.

An analysis of the impact of any increase in freight traffic on railroads and waterways.

An applicant for a permit for a sanitary landfill or for a transfer station may satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) of this section by obtaining a certification from the Division Engineer of the Department of Transportation that the proposed facility
will not have a substantial impact on highway traffic.

History.
2007-550, s. 8(a).

§ 130A-295.6.
Additional requirements for sanitary landfills.

The applicant for a proposed sanitary landfill shall contract with a qualified third party, approved by the Department, to conduct a study of the environmental impacts of any proposed sanitary landfill, in conjunction with its application for a new permit
as defined in G.S. 130A-294(a3). The study shall meet all of the requirements set forth in

G.S. 113A-4

and rules adopted pursuant to

G.S. 113A-4

. If an environmental impact statement is required, the Department shall publish notice of the draft environmental impact statement and shall hold a public hearing in the county where the landfill will be located
no sooner than 30 days following the public notice. The Department shall consider the study of environmental impacts and any mitigation measures proposed by the applicant in deciding whether to issue or deny a permit. An applicant
for a permit for a sanitary landfill shall pay all costs incurred by the Department to comply with the public notice and public hearing requirements of this subsection.

The Department shall require a buffer between any perennial stream or wetland and the nearest waste disposal unit of a sanitary landfill of at least 200 feet. The Department may approve a buffer of less than 200 feet, but in no case less than 100 feet,
if it finds all of the following:

The proposed sanitary landfill or expansion of the sanitary landfill will serve a critical need in the community.

There is no feasible alternative location that would allow siting or expansion of the sanitary landfill with 200-foot buffers.

A waste disposal unit of a sanitary landfill shall not be constructed within:

A 100-year floodplain or land removed from a 100-year floodplain designation pursuant to 44 Code of Federal Regulations Part 72 (1 October 2006 Edition) as a result of man-made alterations within the floodplain such as the placement of fill, except as
authorized by variance granted under

G.S. 143-215.54

A(b). This subdivision does not apply to land removed from a 100-year floodplain designation (i) as a result of floodplain map corrections or updates not resulting from man-made alterations of the affected
areas within the floodplain, or (ii) pursuant to 44 Code of Federal Regulations Part 70 (1 October 2006 Edition) by a letter of map amendment.

A wetland, unless the applicant or permit holder can show all of the following, as to the waste disposal unit:

Where applicable under section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act or applicable State wetlands laws, the presumption that a practicable alternative to the proposed waste disposal unit is available which does not involve wetlands is clearly rebutted;

Construction of the waste disposal unit will not do any of the following:

Cause or contribute to violations of any applicable State water quality standard.

Violate any applicable toxic effluent standard or prohibition under section 307 of the federal Clean Water Act.

Jeopardize the continued existence of endangered or threatened species or result in the destruction or adverse modification of a critical habitat, protected under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973.

Violate any requirement under the federal Marine Protection, Research, and Sanctuaries Act of 1972.

Construction of the waste disposal unit will not cause or contribute to significant degradation of wetlands.

To the extent required under section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act or applicable State wetlands laws, any unavoidable wetlands impacts will be mitigated.

The Department shall not issue a permit to construct any disposal unit of a sanitary landfill if, at the earlier of (i) the acquisition by the applicant or permit holder of the land or of an option to purchase the land on which the waste disposal unit
will be located, (ii) the application by the applicant or permit holder for a franchise agreement, or (iii) at the time of the application for a permit, any portion of the proposed waste disposal unit would be located within:

Five miles of the outermost boundary of a National Wildlife Refuge.

One mile of the outermost boundary of a State gameland owned, leased, or managed by the Wildlife Resources Commission pursuant to

G.S. 113-306

, prior to July 1, 2013, except as provided in subdivision (2a) of this subsection.

(2a) Five hundred feet of the outermost boundary of a State gameland owned, leased, or managed by the Wildlife Resources Commission pursuant to

G.S. 113-306

, prior to July 1, 2013, when all of the following conditions apply:

The waste disposal unit will only be permitted to accept construction and demolition debris waste.

The disposal unit is located within the primary corporate limits of a municipality located in a county with a population of less than 15,000.

All portions of the gameland within one mile of the disposal unit are separated from the disposal unit by a primary highway designated by the Federal Highway Administration as a U.S. Highway.

Two miles of the outermost boundary of a component of the State Parks System.

A sanitary landfill for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste shall be constructed with a liner system that consists of a flexible membrane liner over two feet of soil with a maximum permeability of 1 x 10-5 centimeters per second.
The flexible membrane liner shall have a minimum thickness of thirty one-thousandths of an inch (0.030"), except that a liner that consists of high-density polyethylene shall be at least sixty one-thousandths of an inch (0.060")
thick. The flexible membrane liner shall be installed in direct and uniform contact with the soil layer. The Department may approve an alternative to the soil component of the liner system if the Department finds, based on modeling,
that the alternative liner system will provide an equivalent or greater degree of impermeability.

A sanitary landfill, other than a sanitary landfill for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste, shall be constructed so that the post-settlement bottom elevation of the liner system, or the post-settlement bottom elevation of the waste
if no liner system is required, is a minimum of four feet above both the seasonal high groundwater table and the bedrock datum plane contours. A sanitary landfill for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste shall
be constructed so that the post-settlement bottom elevation of the flexible membrane liner component of the liner system is a minimum of four feet above both the seasonal high groundwater table and the bedrock datum plane contours.

A permit holder for a sanitary landfill shall develop and implement a waste screening plan. The plan shall identify measures adequate to ensure compliance with State laws and rules and any applicable local ordinances that prohibit the disposal of certain
items in landfills. The plan shall address all sources of waste generation. The plan is subject to approval by the Department.

The following requirements apply to any sanitary landfill for which a liner is required:

A geomembrane base liner system shall be tested for leaks and damage by methods approved by the Department that ensure that the entire liner is evaluated.

A leachate collection system shall be designed to return the head of the liner to 30 centimeters or less within 72 hours. The design shall be based on the precipitation that would fall on an empty cell of the sanitary landfill as a result of a 25-year-24-hour
storm event. The leachate collection system shall maintain a head of less than 30 centimeters at all times during leachate recirculation. The Department may require the operator to monitor the head of the liner to demonstrate
that the head is being maintained in accordance with this subdivision and any applicable rules.

All leachate collection lines shall be designed and constructed to permanently allow cleaning and remote camera inspection. Remote camera inspections of the leachate collection lines shall occur upon completion of the construction and at least once every
five years. Cleaning of leachate collection lines found necessary for proper functioning and to address buildup of leachate over the liner shall occur.

Any pipes used to transmit leachate shall provide dual containment outside of the disposal unit. The bottom liner of a sanitary landfill shall be constructed without pipe penetrations.

(h1)
With respect to requirements for daily cover at sanitary landfills, once the Department has approved use of an alternative method of daily cover for use at any sanitary landfill, that alternative method
of daily cover shall be approved for use at all sanitary landfills located within the State.

(h2)
Studies and research and development pertaining to alternative disposal techniques and waste-to-energy matters shall be conducted by certain sanitary landfills as follows:

(1)
The owner or operator of any sanitary landfill permitted to receive more than 240,000 tons of waste per year shall research the development of alternative disposal technologies. In addition, the owner
or operator shall allow access to nonproprietary information and provide site resources for individual research and development projects related to alternative disposal techniques for the purpose of studies that may
be conducted by local community or State colleges and universities or other third-party developers or consultants. The owner or operator shall report on research and development activities conducted pursuant to this
subdivision, and any results of these activities, to the Department annually on or before July 1.

(2)
The owner or operator of any sanitary landfill permitted to receive more than 240,000 tons of waste per year shall perform a feasibility study of landfill gas-to-energy, or other waste-to-energy technology,
to determine opportunities for production of renewable energy from landfills in order to promote economic development and job creation in the State. The owner or operator shall initiate the study when sufficient waste
is in place at the landfill to produce gas, as determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s Landfill Gas Emissions Model (LandGEM), and may consult and coordinate with other entities to facilitate
conduct of the study, including local and State government agencies, economic development organizations, consultants, and third-party developers. The study shall specifically examine opportunities for returning a portion
of the benefits derived from energy produced from the landfill to the jurisdiction within which the landfill is located in the form of direct supply of energy to the local government and its citizens, or through revenue
sharing with the local government from sale of the energy, with revenues owing to the local government credited to a fund specifically designated for economic development within the jurisdiction. The owner or operator
shall report on its activities associated with the study, and any results of the study, to the Department annually on or before July 1.

The Department shall not issue a permit for a sanitary landfill that authorizes:

A capacity of more than 55 million cubic yards of waste.

A disposal area of more than 350 acres.

A maximum height, including the cap and cover vegetation, of more than 250 feet above the mean natural elevation of the disposal area.

This section does not apply to landfills for the disposal of land clearing and inert debris or to Type I or Type II compost facilities.

History.
2007-543, s. 1(a)-(c); 2007-550, s. 9(a), (c); 2013-25, s. 1; 2013-410, s. 47.6; 2013-413, s. 59.1; 2020-74, s. 13.

Reimbursement for Costs of Application for Solid Waste Management Permit.

Session Laws 2007-543, s. 3(a)-(g), provides: “(a) Declaration of Purpose and Intent. — Notwithstanding that an applicant for a permit does not have a reasonable expectation that the law governing the permit will remain unchanged and that the applicant
acquires no vested right by virtue of having made an application, the General Assembly finds that it is in the public interest to provide for the potential compensation of certain applicants who submitted an application for a permit
for a solid waste management facility prior to 1 August 2006 and whose application would be denied under G.S. 130A-295.6(d).

“(b) Reimbursement of Application Costs. — An applicant for a permit for a sanitary landfill may request reimbursement for the reasonable costs for preparation of the permit application incurred prior to 1 August 2006 if the permit would be denied under
G.S. 130A-295.6(d).

“(c) Eligibility for Reimbursement. — To be eligible for reimbursement under this section, the request for reimbursement shall demonstrate all of the following:

“(1) The application for a permit to construct a sanitary landfill was submitted to the Department on or before 1 August 2006.

“(2) The applicant obtained a landfill franchise from the local government with jurisdiction over the site of the proposed landfill on or before 1 August 2006.

“(3) The Department did not grant the permit application in whole or in part.

“(4) The Department did not deny the permit application before 1 August 2007.

“(5) The applicant did not withdraw the permit application before 1 August 2007.

“(6) That the applicant had a reasonable expectation that the application for a permit would have been approved but for the enactment of G.S. 130A-295.6(d).

“(d) Costs Eligible for Reimbursement. — Costs that are necessary for the preparation of the permit application and that are reasonably incurred are eligible for reimbursement under this section. These costs may include site studies, facility plans, construction
and engineering plans, construction quality assurance plans, geologic and hydrologic investigations, operation plans, wildlife or wildlife management studies, closure and post-closure plans, information required by the Department to
satisfy financial assurance and financial responsibility requirements, and other information required by the Department in the permit review. These costs may also include the reasonable fees of environmental consultants, engineers,
geologists, other professionals whose services were necessary to prepare the permit application or to respond to information requests from the Department, and legal costs to obtain a landfill franchise or other approval from the local
government with jurisdiction over the site of the proposed sanitary landfill.

“(e) Costs Not Eligible for Reimbursement. — None of the following costs incurred by or on behalf of the applicant is eligible for reimbursement:

“(1) The costs of acquiring interests in land for construction of the proposed sanitary landfill.

“(2) Legal or lobbying costs incurred in attempting to influence an administrative or legislative body.

“(f) Request for Reimbursement. — The request for reimbursement shall be submitted to the Department no later than 31 December 2007 with information necessary to document the reasonable and necessary costs eligible for reimbursement under this section.
The Department shall review the request for reimbursement and notify the applicant and the Secretary of Revenue of the costs approved for reimbursement under this section. The Secretary of Revenue shall reimburse the approved costs
from the proceeds of the tax imposed under

G.S. 105-187.61

subject to availability of funds. Approved reimbursement costs shall be paid from the proceeds of the tax prior to crediting or distributing the proceeds of the tax as provided in

G.S. 105-187.63

.

“(g) Waiver and Covenant Not to Sue. — An applicant for a permit for a sanitary landfill who accepts reimbursement of costs under this section waives the right to seek reimbursement of those costs under any other provision of law. Prior to receiving any
reimbursement under this section, the applicant shall execute a covenant not to sue the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision of the State for any costs described in subsections (d) and (e) of this section.”

§ 130A-295.7.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-295.8.
Fees applicable to permits for solid waste management facilities.

The Solid Waste Management Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department. All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the Account and shall be used to support the solid waste management program established pursuant
to

G.S. 130A-294

.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.20(c), effective October 1, 2015.

(d1)
A permitted solid waste management facility shall pay an annual permit fee on or before August 1 of each year according to the following schedule:

Municipal Solid Waste Landfill accepting less than 100,000 tons/year of solid waste — $6,125.

Municipal Solid Waste Landfill accepting 100,000 tons/year or more but less than 250,000 tons/year of solid waste — $7,000.

Municipal Solid Waste Landfill accepting 250,000 tons/year or more of solid waste — $8,750.

Post-Closure Municipal Solid Waste Landfill — $1,000.

Construction and Demolition Landfill accepting less than 25,000 tons/year of solid waste — $4,813.

Construction and Demolition Landfill accepting 25,000 tons/year or more of solid waste — $5,500.

Post-Closure Construction and Demolition Landfill — $500.

Industrial Landfill accepting less than 100,000 tons/year of solid waste — $5,500.

Industrial Landfill accepting 100,000 tons/year or more of solid waste — $6,875.

Post-Closure Industrial Landfill — $500.

Transfer Station accepting less than 25,000 tons/year of solid waste — $1,500.

Transfer Station accepting 25,000 tons/year or more of solid waste — $1,875.

Treatment and Processing Facility — $500.

Tire Monofill — $1,000.

Incinerator — $500.

Large Compost Facility — $500.

Land Clearing and Inert Debris Landfill — $500.

(d2)
Upon submission of an application for a new permit, an applicant shall pay an application fee in the amount of ten percent (10%) of the annual permit fee imposed for that type of solid waste management
facility as identified in subdivisions (1) through (17) of subsection (d1) of this section.

(e)
The Department shall determine whether an application for a permit for a solid waste management facility that is subject to a fee under this section is complete within 90 days after the Department receives
the application for the permit. A determination of completeness means that the application includes all required components but does not mean that the required components provide all of the information that is required
for the Department to make a decision on the application. If the Department determines that an application is not complete, the Department shall notify the applicant of the components needed to complete the application.
An applicant may submit additional information to the Department to cure the deficiencies in the application. The Department shall make a final determination as to whether the application is complete within the later
of: (i) 90 days after the Department receives the application for the permit less the number of days that the applicant uses to provide the additional information; or (ii) 30 days after the Department receives the additional
information from the applicant. The Department shall issue a draft permit decision on an application for a permit within one year after the Department determines that the application is complete. The Department shall
hold a public hearing and accept written comment on the draft permit decision for a period of not less than 30 or more than 60 days after the Department issues a draft permit decision. The Department shall issue a final
permit decision on an application for a permit within 90 days after the comment period on the draft permit decision closes. The Department and the applicant may mutually agree to extend any time period under this subsection.
If the Department fails to act within any time period set out in this subsection, the applicant may treat the failure to act as a denial of the permit and may challenge the denial as provided in Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes.

History.
2007-550, s. 13(a); 2013-408, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 14.20(c); 2015-286, s. 4.9(b), (d); 2017-10, ss. 3.1(b), (d), 3.2(a), (b), (e).

§ 130A-295.9.
Solid waste disposal tax; use of proceeds.

It is the intent that the proceeds of the solid waste disposal tax imposed by Article 5G of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes credited to the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund pursuant to

G.S. 105-187.63(1)

shall be used by the Department of Environmental Quality to fund the assessment and remediation of pre-1983 landfills, except up to nineteen percent (19%) of the funds credited under this subdivision may be used to fund
administrative expenses related to hazardous and solid waste management.

History.
2007-550, s. 14(b); 2009-451, s. 13.3E; 2010-31, s. 13.9(a); 2014-100, s. 14.24(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Cross References.

As to solid waste disposal tax, generally, see

G.S. 105-187.60

et seq.

§ 130A-296.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 501, s. 15.

§ 130A-297.
Receipt and distribution of funds.

The Department may accept loans and grants from the federal government and other sources for carrying out the purposes of this Article, and shall adopt reasonable policies governing the administration and distribution of funds to units of local government,
other State agencies, and private agencies, institutions or individuals for studies, investigations, demonstrations, surveys, planning, training, and construction or establishment of solid waste management facilities.

History.
1969, c. 899; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1983, c. 1891, s. 2.